Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-401
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-401 to 71-479 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 65;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 41;

Laws 2007, LB203, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 31;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB999, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB34, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB542, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB1077, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB459, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 68;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 17;

Laws 2016, LB722, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB166, § 19;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 92;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 50;

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB697, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 70.